Alaska, session 34, HB113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 43.20.012(a) is amended to read: 06 (a) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply to 07 (1) an individual; 08 (2) a fiduciary; 09 (3) the income received by a regional association qualified under 10 AS 16.10.380 or nonprofit corporation holding a hatchery permit under AS 16.10.400 11 from the sale of salmon or salmon eggs under AS 16.10.450 or from a cost recovery 12 fishery under AS 16.10.455; [OR] 13 (4) the income received by a nonprofit corporation holding a permit 14 under AS 16.12.010 from the sale of shellfish under AS 16.12.080 or from a cost 01 recovery fishery under AS 16.12.090; or 02 (5) an Alaska corporation that is a qualified small business and 03 that meets the active business requirements in 26 U.S.C. 1202(e), as that 04 subsection read on January 1, 2012, subject to the restrictions set out in (f) of this 05 section. 06 * Sec. 2. AS 43.20.012 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 07 (e) For the purposes of (a)(5) of this section, 08 (1) whether a corporation qualifies under (a)(5) of this section shall be 09 determined on the first day of the tax year for which the corporation claims it qualifies 10 under (a)(5) of this section; 11 (2) all corporations that are members of the same parent-subsidiary 12 controlled group shall be treated as one corporation. 13 (f) The total amount of tax foregone by the state under (a)(5) of this section 14 may not exceed $2,700,000 each calendar year. If the total amount of tax foregone 15 under (a)(5) of this section exceeds $2,700,000 in a calendar year, the department shall 16 allocate the tax exemption in order of returns received that year. 17 (g) The department shall notify a known corporation that qualifies under (a)(5) 18 of this section at least one year before the expiration of the exemption under (a)(5) of 19 this section. 20 (h) In this section, 21 (1) "Alaska corporation" means a corporation that has been 22 incorporated in the state or is authorized to do business in the state; 23 (2) "parent-subsidiary controlled group" has the meaning given in 26 24 U.S.C. 1202, as that section read on January 1, 2012; 25 (3) "qualified small business" has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 26 1202, as that section read on January 1, 2012, and does not include a construction, 27 transportation, utility, or fisheries business. 28 * Sec. 3. AS 43.98 is amended by adding new sections to read: 29 Sec. 43.98.031. Film production tax credit. (a) In cooperation with the film 30 production promotion program, the department shall provide a transferable film 31 production tax credit to a producer for qualified production expenditures. 01 (b) A tax credit provided under (a) of this section may be sold, assigned, 02 exchanged, conveyed, or otherwise transferred in whole or in part. 03 (c) A taxpayer acquiring a transferable credit may use the credit or a portion of 04 the credit to offset taxes imposed under AS 43.20 (Alaska Net Income Tax Act). Any 05 portion of the credit not used may be used at a later period or transferred under (b) of 06 this section. 07 (d) The department shall adopt regulations necessary for the administration of 08 this section. 09 (e) A credit provided under (a) of this section, whether sold, assigned, 10 exchanged, conveyed, or otherwise transferred, in whole or in part, must be used 11 within three years after being provided by the department. 12 (f) The number of tax credits provided in the aggregate under this section may 13 not exceed $20,000,000. 14 Sec. 43.98.032. Eligibility. (a) A film production is eligible for a tax credit 15 under AS 43.98.031 if the producer has $100,000 or more in qualified expenditures, as 16 determined under AS 43.98.036, in a consecutive 24-month period. 17 (b) The following productions are not eligible, regardless of the production 18 costs: 19 (1) news, weather, or current events programming; 20 (2) a production produced primarily for industrial, corporate, or 21 institutional purposes, and for internal use; 22 (3) an advertisement, infomercial, or any other production that solicits 23 funds, except for a commercial television advertisement produced for national 24 distribution; or 25 (4) a political advertisement. 26 Sec. 43.98.033. Qualification for film production tax credit. (a) A film 27 producer may apply for the film production tax credit under AS 43.98.031 by 28 submitting an application to the film production promotion program. The application 29 must include 30 (1) a script or synopsis of the production; 31 (2) the names of the producer, director, and proposed cast; 01 (3) estimated start, completion, and filming dates; and 02 (4) other information the film production promotion program may 03 require to determine the producer's eligibility for a credit and the estimated amount of 04 the credit. 05 (b) If the film production promotion program approves an application 06 submitted under (a) of this section, the film production promotion program shall issue 07 a notice of qualification to the producer. The notice of qualification must include a 08 determination by the film production promotion program of the estimated film 09 production tax credit for which the production qualifies. 10 Sec. 43.98.034. Award of film production tax credit. (a) Subject to 11 AS 43.98.031(f), the film production promotion program, in cooperation with the 12 department, shall determine the amount of the tax credit under AS 43.98.031 available 13 to a producer who has obtained a notice of qualification under AS 43.98.033(b), based 14 on the qualified expenditures of the production under AS 43.98.036. 15 (b) The base amount of a tax credit awarded under this section is equal to 25 16 percent of the qualified expenditures of the production. 17 (c) In determining the amount of the tax credit, the percentage provided by (b) 18 of this section shall be increased by the film production promotion program based on 19 the following criteria: 20 (1) an additional 5 percent of qualified expenditures that are wages 21 paid to Alaska residents; 22 (2) an additional two percent of qualified expenditures made in a rural 23 area; and 24 (3) an additional two percent of qualified expenditures made in the 25 state between October 1 and March 30. 26 (d) After completion of the production, the producer shall provide the film 27 production promotion program with a production cost report detailing the qualified 28 expenditures of the production, with verification by an independent certified public 29 accountant approved by the film production promotion program that the costs claimed 30 in the report are qualified expenditures under AS 43.98.036. 31 (e) Subject to (g) of this section, the film production promotion program, in 01 cooperation with the department, shall determine the amount of the tax credit based on 02 the information provided by the producer under (d) of this section and shall award a 03 tax credit in cooperation with the department if the producer has satisfied all 04 requirements under AS 43.98.031 - 43.98.038. 05 (f) The award of a tax credit under this section is conditioned on the 06 producer's and the production's full compliance with all applicable state laws and 07 regulations. At the request of the film production promotion program, a producer shall 08 provide any information necessary for the film production promotion program to 09 determine the producer's and production's compliance with this subsection. 10 (g) In determining the amount of a tax credit awarded under this section, the 11 film production promotion program may reduce the amount of the tax credit by any 12 amount the film production promotion program considers necessary to allow the state, 13 or a political subdivision of the state, to recover the cost of any damages caused by 14 any act or omission of the producer or production. 15 (h) The film production promotion program, in cooperation with the 16 department, may withhold the award of a tax credit under this section if the program 17 determines that there are filed, but unresolved, legal actions in the state involving the 18 producer or production. 19 (i) To qualify for the tax credit under AS 43.98.031, a producer shall include, 20 in the end credits of each qualified film, the logo designed under former 21 AS 44.25.105(b) and the words, "Filmed in Alaska with the Support of the State of 22 Alaska." 23 Sec. 43.98.036. Determination of qualified expenditures. (a) Expenditures 24 made by a production company in connection with a film production approved by the 25 film production promotion program that shall be considered qualified expenditures 26 must be directly related to the production and be incurred in the state. Only 27 expenditures that are ordinary, reasonable, and not in excess of fair market value and 28 that are for real or tangible property, fees, services, or state or municipal taxes shall be 29 considered. Expenditures may include 30 (1) costs of set construction and operation; 31 (2) costs of wardrobes, make-up, accessories, and related services; 01 (3) costs associated with photography and sound synchronization; 02 (4) costs of lighting and related services and materials; 03 (5) costs of editing and related services; 04 (6) rental of facilities and equipment; 05 (7) leasing of vehicles; 06 (8) costs of food and lodging; 07 (9) costs of digital or tape editing, film processing, transfer of film to 08 tape or digital format, sound mixing, and special and visual effects; 09 (10) the total aggregate payroll for services performed in Alaska, 10 including all salaries, wages, compensation, and related benefits provided to 11 producers, directors, writers, actors, and other personnel that are directly attributable 12 to services performed in Alaska; 13 (11) the costs of the use of an Alaska business for processing qualified 14 payroll and related expenditures; 15 (12) costs of music, if performed, composed, or recorded by an Alaska 16 musician, or released or published by an Alaska business; 17 (13) costs of intrastate travel, if provided by an Alaska business; 18 (14) costs relating to the design, construction, improvement, or repair 19 of a film, video, television, or digital production or postproduction facility or related 20 property, infrastructure, or equipment, except commercial exhibition facilities, as 21 determined by the film production promotion program; or 22 (15) other similar production expenditures as determined by the film 23 production promotion program in cooperation with the Department of Revenue. 24 (b) Production costs that may not be considered qualified expenditures include 25 (1) costs related to the acquisition, determination, transfer, or use of a 26 film production tax credit under AS 43.98.031; 27 (2) postproduction expenditures for marketing and distribution; 28 (3) production financing, depreciation, and amortization costs, and 29 other costs that are not cash or cash equivalent expenditures directly attributable to 30 production costs incurred in the state; 31 (4) amounts that are later reimbursed or reasonably anticipated to be 01 reimbursed, resulting in a reduction in production costs; 02 (5) amounts that are reasonably anticipated to be recovered through 03 subsequent sale or other realization of value by disposal of an asset that has been 04 claimed as a qualified expenditure; 05 (6) amounts that are paid to a person or entity as a result of 06 participation in profits from the exploitation of the production; 07 (7) costs incurred in the purchase of real or tangible property for which 08 a qualified expenditure has, at any time, been claimed. 09 Sec. 43.98.037. Recovery of film production tax credit. (a) The film 10 production promotion program, in cooperation with the department, may review, 11 audit, and bring legal proceedings to recover any amount of a tax credit awarded under 12 AS 43.98.034 from a producer or production to which a credit was awarded if the film 13 production promotion program determines that the film producer or production is 14 liable for damages to the state, or any political subdivision of the state. 15 (b) Legal proceedings may not be brought under (a) of this section more than 16 one year after the date the tax credit was awarded under AS 43.98.034. 17 Sec. 43.98.038. Definitions. In AS 43.98.031 - 43.98.038, 18 (1) "Alaska business" means 19 (A) a person who holds a current Alaska business license; 20 (B) a person who provides goods or services under the name as 21 appearing on the person's current Alaska business license; 22 (C) a person who has maintained a place of business within the 23 state staffed by the person or an employee of the person for a period of six 24 months immediately preceding the date the goods or services were provided; 25 (D) a person who is 26 (i) incorporated or qualified to do business under the 27 laws of the state; 28 (ii) a sole proprietorship, and the proprietor is a resident 29 of the state; 30 (iii) a limited liability company organized under 31 AS 10.50, and all members are residents of the state; or 01 (iv) a partnership under former AS 32.05, AS 32.06, or 02 AS 32.11, and all partners are residents of the state; and 03 (E) if the business is a joint venture, a joint venture composed 04 entirely of ventures that qualify under (A) - (D) of this subsection; 05 (2) "department" means the Department of Revenue; 06 (3) "film" includes television, commercials, and videos; 07 (4) "film production promotion program" means the film production 08 promotion program created under AS 44.33.231; 09 (5) "producer" means a person who arranges financing for or 10 supervises the production of a film, video, commercial, or television production or 11 pilot; 12 (6) "rural area" means a community with a population of 1,500 or less 13 or a community with a population of 7,500 or less that is not connected by road or rail 14 to Anchorage or Fairbanks. 15 * Sec. 4. AS 44.33.231(b) is amended to read: 16 (b) The purpose of the film production promotion program is to 17 (1) work with organizations in the private sector for the expansion and 18 development of film production industries in the state; 19 (2) promote Alaska as an appropriate location for film production; 20 (3) provide production assistance through connecting film directors, 21 makers, and producers with Alaska location scouts and contractors, including 22 contractors providing assistance with permit applications; [AND] 23 (4) certify Alaska film production internship training programs and 24 promote the employment of program interns by eligible productions; and 25 (5) in cooperation with the Department of Revenue, administer the 26 Alaska film production promotion program. 27 * Sec. 5. AS 44.33.231 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 28 (d) Subject to appropriations for the purpose, the film production promotion 29 program shall administer, in cooperation with the Department of Revenue, the Alaska 30 film production promotion program to provide a tax credit under AS 43.98.031 for 31 certain film production expenditures incurred in the state. 01 (e) The film production promotion program, in cooperation with the 02 Department of Revenue, may adopt procedures and regulations to carry out its 03 functions under this section. 04 * Sec. 6. AS 43.20.012(a)(5), 43.20.012(e), 43.20.012(f), 43.20.012(g), and 43.20.012(h) 05 are repealed July 1, 2035. 06 * Sec. 7. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 07 read: 08 APPLICABILITY. AS 43.20.012(a), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, and 09 AS 43.20.012(e) - (h), enacted by sec. 2 of this Act, apply to the tax year of a corporation 10 beginning on or after the effective date of this Act and before the repeal in sec. 6 of this Act. 11 * Sec. 8. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 12 read: 13 NOTIFICATION. When the number of tax credits provided under AS 43.98.031(f), 14 enacted by sec. 3 of this Act, in the aggregate and the estimated amount of tax credits that 15 could be claimed based on notices of qualification issued by the film production promotion 16 program under AS 44.33.234(b), together equal $20,000,000, the commissioner of revenue 17 shall notify the presiding officers of each house of the legislature in writing. 18 * Sec. 9. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.